bg-BG: Химична основа на спирачна/съединителна течност: На гликолна основа; На основата на минерално масло; На силиконова основа; Други
tr: Fren/debriyaj hidroliği baz kimyası: Glikol bazlı; Mineral yağ bazlı; Silikon bazlı; Diğer
it: Chimica di base del fluido per freni/frizione: A base di glicole; A base di olio minerale; A base siliconica; Altro
pt-BR: Composição química do fluido de freio/embreagem: À base de glicol; À base de óleo mineral; À base de silicone; Outro
el: Βασική χημεία υγρού φρένων/συμπλέκτη: Με βάση τη γλυκόλη; Με βάση το ορυκτέλαιο; Με βάση τη σιλικόνη; Άλλο
hr-HR: Kemija baze tekućine za kočnicu/spojku: Na bazi glikola; Na bazi mineralnog ulja; Na bazi silikona; Ostalo
sk-SK: Chemické zloženie základu brzdovej/spojkovej kvapaliny: Na báze glykolu; Na báze minerálneho oleja; Na báze silikónu; Iné
fi: Jarru-/kytkinnesteen kemiallinen koostumus: Glykolipohjainen; Mineraaliöljypohjainen; Silikonipohjainen; Muu
en: Brake/clutch fluid base chemistry: Glycol based; Mineral oil based; Silicone based; Other
de: Chemische Basis für Brems-/Kupplungsflüssigkeit: Glykolbasiert; Mineralölbasiert; Silikonbasiert; Sonstige
ko: 브레이크/클러치액 기유 화학 성분: 글리콜 기반; 미네랄 오일 기반; 실리콘 기반; 기타
sl-SI: Kemična sestava zavorne tekočine/tekočine sklopke: Na osnovi glikola; Na osnovi mineralnega olja; Na osnovi silikona; Drugo
hu: fék-/kuplungfolyadék kémiai alapösszetétele: Glikolalapú; Ásványolajalapú; Szilikonalapú; Egyéb
ro-RO: Chimia de bază a lichidului de frână/ambreiaj: Pe bază de glicol; Pe bază de ulei mineral; Pe bază de silicon; Altele
pl: Skład chemiczny bazy płynu hamulcowego/przekładniowego: Na bazie glikolu; Na bazie oleju mineralnego; Na bazie silikonu; Inne
vi: Thành phần hóa học cơ bản của dầu phanh/ly hợp: Gốc glycol; Gốc dầu khoáng; Gốc silicone; Khác
cs: Chemické složení brzdové a spojkové kapaliny: Na bázi glykolu; Na bázi minerálního oleje; Na bázi silikonu; Jiné
ja: ブレーキ／クラッチフルードベース化学組成: グリコール系; 鉱物油系; シリコン系; その他
pt-PT: Composição química do fluido de travões/embraiagem: À base de glicol; À base de óleo mineral; À base de silicone; Outro
zh-CN: 制动/离合液基础化学成分: 乙二醇基; 矿物油基; 硅基; 其他
da: Bremse-/koblingsvæskebaseret kemi: Glykolbaseret; Mineraloliebaseret; Silikonebaseret; Andet
fr: Composition chimique de base du liquide de frein et d'embrayage: À base de glycol; À base d’huile minérale; À base de silicone; Autre
th: องค์ประกอบทางเคมีพื้นฐานของน้ำมันเบรก/คลัตช์: สูตรไกลคอล; สูตรมิเนอรัลออยล์; สูตรซิลิโคน; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 煞車/離合器油基礎化學成分: 乙二醇基; 礦物油基; 矽基; 其他
es: Química básica de líquido de frenos y embrague: A base de glicol; A base de aceite mineral; A base de silicona; Otro
nl: Chemische basis rem-/koppelingsvloeistof: Op glycolbasis; Op basis van minerale olie; Op siliconenbasis; Overig
ru: Химическая основа тормозной/сцепной жидкости: Гликолевая; На основе минерального масла; Силиконовая; Другое
lt-LT: Stabdžių / sankabos skysčio bazės chemija: Glikolio pagrindo; Mineralinės alyvos pagrindo; Silikono pagrindo; Kitas
nb: Kjemisk informasjon om bremsevæske/klutsjvæske: Glykolbasert; Mineraloljebasert; Silikonbasert; Annet
sv: Baskemi för broms-/kopplingsvätska: Glykolbaserad; Mineraloljebaserad; Silikonbaserad; Övrigt